installation/solr-6.x/kramerius/cs_CZ_ascii.aff
SFX B Y 257
SFX B   e           es         e
SFX B   e           u          [^cj]e
SFX B   e           i          ce
SFX B   e           i          je
SFX B   e           eme        e
SFX B   e           ete        e
SFX B   e           ou         [^cj]e
SFX B   ce          teji       ce
SFX B   e           i          je
SFX B   ce          tej        ce
SFX B   ce          tejme      ce
SFX B   ce          tejte      ce
SFX B   e           0          [rs]e
SFX B   e           me         [rs]e
SFX B   e           te         [rs]e
SFX B   ze          z          [^ail]ze
SFX B   ize         iz         ize
SFX B   aze         az         aze
SFX B   ze          zi         lze
SFX B   ce          c          [^a]ce
SFX B   ce          c          ace
SFX B   re          ri         re
SFX B   se          s          [^i]se
SFX B   ise         is         ise
SFX B   je          j          je
SFX B   e           i          ve
SFX B   ne          n          ne
SFX B   te          t          [^s]te
SFX B   de          d          [ae]de
SFX B   de          di         [^ea]de
SFX B   e           te         [^czstncdv]e
SFX B   e           me         [^czstncdv]e
SFX B   se          sme        [^i]se
SFX B   se          ste        [^i]se
SFX B   ise         isme       ise
SFX B   ise         iste       ise
SFX B   ze          zme        [^ail]ze
SFX B   ze          zte        [^ail]ze
SFX B   ize         izme       ize
SFX B   ize         izte       ize
SFX B   aze         azme       aze
SFX B   aze         azte       aze
SFX B   0           me         lze
SFX B   0           te         lze
SFX B   ce          cme        [^a]ce
SFX B   ce          cte        [^a]ce
SFX B   ace         acme       ace
SFX B   ace         acte       ace
SFX B   de          deme       [^ea]de
SFX B   de          dete       [^ea]de
SFX B   de          dme        [ae]de
SFX B   de          dte        [ae]de
SFX B   ne          nme        ne
SFX B   ne          nte        ne
SFX B   te          tme        [^s]te
SFX B   te          tte        [^s]te
SFX B   e           eme        ve
SFX B   e           ete        ve
SFX B   u           es         [^dtn]u
SFX B   u           e          [^dtn]u
SFX B   u           eme        [^dtn]u
SFX B   u           ete        [^dtn]u
SFX B   u           ou         u
SFX B   nu          nes        nu
SFX B   nu          ne         nu
SFX B   nu          neme       nu
SFX B   nu          nete       nu
SFX B   u           i          lzu
SFX B   u           i          [^aeiouyaeiouyue][^aeiouyaeiouyuez]u
SFX B   u           eme        [^aeiouyaeiouyue][bdfmnptvw]u
SFX B   u           eme        [^aeiouyaeiouyue][ccghjklrrssz]u
SFX B   u           ete        [^aeiouyaeiouyue][bdfmnptvw]u
SFX B   u           ete        [^aeiouyaeiouyue][ccghjklrrssz]u
SFX B   du          d          [aeiouyaeiouyue]du
SFX B   du          dme        [aeiouyaeiouyue]du
SFX B   du          dte        [aeiouyaeiouyue]du
SFX B   nu          n          [aeiouyaeiouyue]nu
SFX B   nu          nme        [aeiouyaeiouyue]nu
SFX B   nu          nte        [aeiouyaeiouyue]nu
SFX B   tu          t          [aeiouyaeiouyue]tu
SFX B   tu          tme        [aeiouyaeiouyue]tu
SFX B   tu          tte        [aeiouyaeiouyue]tu
SFX B   u           0          [aeiouyaeiouyue][ccghjklrrsz]u
SFX B   u           me         [aeiouyaeiouyue][ccghjklrrsz]u
SFX B   u           te         [aeiouyaeiouyue][ccghjklrrsz]u
SFX B   isu         is         isu
SFX B   isu         isme       isu
SFX B   isu         iste       isu
SFX B   i           es         [^t]i
SFX B   i           es         [^t]i
SFX B   i           e          [^t]i
SFX B   i           eme        [^t]i
SFX B   i           ete        [^t]i
SFX B   i           i          [^t]i
SFX B   i           0          ji
SFX B   i           me         ji
SFX B   i           te         ji
SFX B   m           s          im
SFX B   m           0          im
SFX B   0           e          im
SFX B   m           te         im
SFX B   im          0          zim
SFX B   im          me         zim
SFX B   im          te         zim
SFX B   im          i          [^aeiouyaeiouyue][^aeiouyaeiouyue]im
SFX B   im          eme        [^aeiouyaeiouyue][bdfmnptvw]im
SFX B   im          eme        [^aeiouyaeiouyue][ccghjklrrssz]im
SFX B   im          ete        [^aeiouyaeiouyue][bdfmnptvw]im
SFX B   im          ete        [^aeiouyaeiouyue][ccghjklrrssz]im
SFX B   ojim        uj         ojim
SFX B   ojim        ujme       ojim
SFX B   ojim        ujte       ojim
SFX B   0           i          [aaeiuy]t
SFX B   it          iji        it
SFX B   it          ijes       it
SFX B   it          ije        it
SFX B   it          ijeme      it
SFX B   it          ijete      it
SFX B   it          iji        it
SFX B   it          ij         it
SFX B   it          ijme       it
SFX B   it          ijte       it
SFX B   it          il         it
SFX B   it          ila        it
SFX B   it          ilo        it
SFX B   it          ili        it
SFX B   it          ily        it
SFX B   t           ji         et
SFX B   t           jes        et
SFX B   t           je         et
SFX B   t           jeme       et
SFX B   t           jete       et
SFX B   t           ji         et
SFX B   t           j          et
SFX B   t           jme        et
SFX B   t           jte        et
SFX B   t           ji         et
SFX B   t           jes        et
SFX B   t           je         et
SFX B   t           jeme       et
SFX B   t           jete       et
SFX B   t           ji         et
SFX B   t           j          et
SFX B   t           jme        et
SFX B   t           jte        et
SFX B   yt          yji        yt
SFX B   yt          yjes       yt
SFX B   yt          yje        yt
SFX B   yt          yjeme      yt
SFX B   yt          yjete      yt
SFX B   yt          yji        yt
SFX B   yt          yj         yt
SFX B   yt          yjme       yt
SFX B   yt          yjte       yt
SFX B   yt          yl         yt
SFX B   yt          yla        yt
SFX B   yt          ylo        yt
SFX B   yt          yli        yt
SFX B   yt          yly        yt
SFX B   at          aji        [^bpvmnrd]at
SFX B   at          ajes       [^bpvmnrd]at
SFX B   at          aje        [^bpvmnrd]at
SFX B   at          ajeme      [^bpvmnrd]at
SFX B   at          ajete      [^bpvmnrd]at
SFX B   at          aji        [^bpvmnrd]at
SFX B   at          aj         [^bpvmnrd]at
SFX B   at          ajme       [^bpvmnrd]at
SFX B   at          ajte       [^bpvmnrd]at
SFX B   at          ajic       [^bpvmnrd]at
SFX B   at          ajice      [^bpvmnrd]at
SFX B   at          eji        [bpvmn]at
SFX B   at          ejes       [bpvmn]at
SFX B   at          eje        [bpvmn]at
SFX B   at          ejeme      [bpvmn]at
SFX B   at          ejete      [bpvmn]at
SFX B   at          eji        [bpvmn]at
SFX B   at          ej         [bpvmn]at
SFX B   at          ejme       [bpvmn]at
SFX B   at          ejte       [bpvmn]at
SFX B   at          ejic       [bpvmn]at
SFX B   at          ejice      [bpvmn]at
SFX B   0           i          dat
SFX B   t           m          dat
SFX B   t           s          dat
SFX B   t           0          dat
SFX B   t           me         dat
SFX B   t           te         dat
SFX B   at          aji        dat
SFX B   at          ej         dat
SFX B   at          ejme       dat
SFX B   at          ejte       dat
SFX B   at          eji        rat
SFX B   at          ejes       rat
SFX B   at          eje        rat
SFX B   at          ejeme      rat
SFX B   at          ejete      rat
SFX B   at          eji        rat
SFX B   at          ej         rat
SFX B   at          ejme       rat
SFX B   at          ejte       rat
SFX B   at          ejic       rat
SFX B   at          ejice      rat
SFX B   out         uji        [^m]out
SFX B   out         ujes       [^m]out
SFX B   out         uje        [^m]out
SFX B   out         ujeme      [^m]out
SFX B   out         ujete      [^m]out
