installation/solr-6.x/kramerius/cs_CZ_ascii.dic
blit/BN
cupu/BN
deji/BN
dobit/BN
dobudu/BN
dodupu/BN
dohrat/BTN
dohudu/BN
dojdu/BN
dojmu/BN
dokazi/BN
doklubu/BN
dokovu/BN
dolzu/BN
domyt/BTN
doodeji/BN
doodepisi/BN
doohrat/BON
dopisi/BN
dopit/BN
doplout/BN
dorostu/BN
doryt/BTN
dosat/BON
doseji/BN
dospat/BTN
dostat/BN
dostojim/BN
dosit/BTN
dotat/BTN
dotepu/BN
dotresu/BN
doucim/BN
dout/BN
dovazi/BN
dovit/BN
dovyt/BN
dozenu/BN
doznu/BN
hnit/BN
hrat/BN
chce/BN
jdu/BN
jmu/BN
kat/BN
kleji/BN
klubu/BN
kout/BTN
kryt/BTN
lit/BN
lzu/BN
melu/BN
nabit/BN
nabudu/BN
nadejdu/BN
nadepisi/BN
nadezenu/BN
nadout/BTN
nahnit/BN
nahrat/BON
najedu/BN
nakapu/BN
nakousu/BN
nalzu/BN
napasu/BN
napisu/BN
napleji/BN
narostu/BN
nareknu/BN
naseji/BN
naspat/BTN
nastelu/BN
nastunu/BN
naskubu/BN
navat/BON
navedu/BN
nazenu/BN
nyt/BN
obejdu/BN
obelzu/BN
obestelu/BN
obezenu/BN
objedu/BN
obkovu/BN
obmyt/BTN
obrostu/BN
obstojim/BN
obvazi/BN
odbit/BN
oddupu/BN
odejdu/BN
odeji/BN
odeju/BN
odepisi/BN
odeplout/BN
odestelu/BN
odeslu/BN
odezenu/BN
odkapu/BN
odkousu/BN
odlit/BN
odplout/BN
odreknu/BN
odstojim/BN
odtat/BTN
odupu/BN
odvazi/BN
odvlat/BN
odzit/BTN
ohrat/BON
okapu/BN
okousu/BN
omelu/BN
opisi/BN
opit/BN
osit/BN
otazi/BN
oudim/BN
ovazi/BN
ozebu/BN
ozit/BN
pet/B
pisu/BN
pleji/BN
plovu/BN
pobit/BN
poblit/BN
podbit/BN
podeji/BN
podemelu/BN
podepisu/BN
podestelu/BN
podjedu/BN
podplout/BTN
podreknu/BN
podsit/BTN
podvazi/BN
pohrat/BTN
pojedu/BN
pokapu/BN
pokryt/BTN
poletim/BN
polit/BN
pomelu/BN
ponesu/BN
poodjedu/BN
pookrat/BN
popisi/BN
popit/BN
popojdu/BN
poporostu/BN
popozenu/BN
porostu/BN
posecu/BN
posmat/BN
postehuji/BN
postojim/BN
posit/BTN
potazi/BN
potresu/BN
poudim/BN
pousmat/BN
povazi/BN
povezu/BN
povstat/BN
pozbudu/BN
pozit/BTN
probit/BN
procupu/BN
prohnit/BN
prohrat/BON
projdu/BN
projmu/BN
prokazi/BN
proklubu/BN
prokovu/BN
prolit/BN
promyt/BTN
propasu/BN
propisu/BN
propleji/BN
prorostu/BN
proreknu/BN
proslout/BN
prospat/BTN
prostojim/BN
prosit/BTN
protresu/BN
proudim/BN
provazi/BN
provyt/BN
prozit/BTN
prebit/BN
predehrat/BON
predejmu/BN
predepisi/BN
predeslu/BN
predjedu/BN
predsit/BTN
predvazi/BN
prehrat/BTN
prejdu/BN
prejmu/BN
prekousu/BN
prekovu/BN
prelit/BN
premelu/BN
prepisu/BN
preplout/BTN
prerostu/BN
prereknu/BN
preseji/BN
prestat/BN
prestojim/BN
pretnu/BN
prevat/BON
prevedu/BN
prezout/BTN
prezenu/BN
pribit/BN
pridupu/BN
prihrat/BON
prijmu/BN
prikazi/BN
prikryt/BTN
primet/BN
priodeju/BN
pripisu/BN
priplout/BN
prireknu/BN
prisecu/BN
prispet/BN
pristelu/BN
privat/BON
privedu/BN
prizabit/BN
rostu/BN
rozcupu/BN
rozehrat/BTN
rozechvet/BTN
rozemelu/BN
rozepisu/BN
rozesmat/BN
rozestelu/BN
rozeslu/BN
rozevlat/BN
rozeznu/BN
rozkapu/BN
rozklovu/BN
rozkout/BTN
rozkryt/BTN
rozmyt/BTN
rozrostu/BN
rozsecu/BN
rozstunu/BN
rozskubu/BN
roztepu/BN
rozvedu/BN
rozvrzu/BN
rubu/BN
reknu/BN
sbit/BN
sehrat/BTN
seji/BN
selzu/BN
sepisi/BN
sepsout/BTN
sesout/BTN
seslu/BN
setresu/BN
seznu/BN
schnu/BN
skapu/BN
skvet/BJN
slout/BN
smyt/BTN
spasu/BN
spet/BN
splout/BTN
spoluzit/BN
sreknu/BN
stojim/BN
stunu/BN
svazi/BN
szit/BTN
skubu/BN
tazi/BN
tnu/BN
tyt/BN
ubudu/BN
udat/BN
udupu/BN
uhrat/BTN
ujdu/BN
ujmu/BN
ukazi/BN
ukousu/BN
ukovu/BN
ulit/BN
umyt/BTN
upisu/BN
uplout/BN
usmat/BN
uspet/BN
ustelu/BN
usit/BTN
utresu/BN
uvedu/BN
uvit/BN
uzenu/BN
vat/BON
vbit/BN
vedu/BN
vepisi/BN
veplout/BN
vevat/BON
vidim/BN
vjedu/BN
vlat/BN
vpit/BN
vrostu/BN
vrzu/BN
vstanu/BN
vybit/BN
vybudu/BN
vydout/BTN
vyhnit/BN
vyhrat/BON
vyjedu/BN
vykapu/BN
vyklubu/BN
vykout/BTN
vykryt/BTN
vylzu/BN
vymyt/BTN
vynasmat/BN
vypet/B
vypisu/BN
vypleji/BN
vyrostu/BN
vyryt/BTN
vysat/BON
vyseji/BN
vyspat/BTN
vystelu/BN
vystunu/BN
vyskubu/BN
vytat/BTN
vytepu/BN
vytresu/BN
vyvat/BON
vyvedu/BN
vyzout/BTN
vyzenu/BN
vyznu/BN
vzejdu/BN
vzkazi/BN
vzenu/BN
zabit/BN
zadupu/BN
zahrat/BTN
zahudu/BN
zachvet/BN
zajedu/BN
zakapu/BN
zakleji/BN
zalit/BN
zamelu/BN
zapet/B
zapisu/BN
zaplout/BN
zarostu/BN
zaryt/BTN
zaseji/BN
zasmat/BN
zaspat/BTN
zastelu/BN
zasit/BTN
zaslu/BN
zatresu/BN
zavat/BON
zavedu/BN
zavlat/BN
zavyt/BN
zazenu/BN
zaznu/BN
zdat/BN
zet/BN
zmatu/BN
zpit/BN
zreknu/BN
zit/BTN
